Hawaii statutes.
§431:11-117 Severability of provisions. If
any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions
or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid
provisions or applications, and for this purpose the provisions of this article
are severable. [L 1987, c 349, pt of §8]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next